Washington statutes.
RCW 36.64.090

Conferences to study regional and governmental problems—Articles—Officers—Agents and employees.

The governing bodies of the counties and cities so associated in a conference shall adopt articles of association and bylaws, select a chair and such other officers as they may determine, and may employ and discharge such agents and employees as the officers deem convenient to carry out the purposes of the conference.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4100; 1965 ex.s. c 84 s 2.]